Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-358.03
Permanent child support payments; failure to pay; work release program.

Any person found guilty of contempt of court for failure to pay permanent child support payments and imprisoned therefor shall be committed to a court-supervised work release program. Ninety percent of earnings realized from such program shall be applied to payment of delinquencies in support payments minus appropriate deductions for the cost of work release.

Laws 1975, LB 212, § 5.